Texas statutes.
FAMILY CODE

TITLE 5. THE PARENT-CHILD RELATIONSHIP AND THE SUIT AFFECTING THE PARENT-CHILD RELATIONSHIP

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 109. APPEALS

Sec. 109.001. TEMPORARY ORDERS DURING PENDENCY OF APPEAL. (a) In a suit affecting the parent-child relationship, on the motion of any party or on the court's own motion and after notice and hearing, the court may make any order necessary to preserve and protect the safety and welfare of the child during the pendency of an appeal as the court may deem necessary and equitable. In addition to other matters, an order may:

(1) appoint temporary conservators for the child and provide for possession of the child;

(2) require the temporary support of the child by a party;

(3) enjoin a party from molesting or disturbing the peace of the child or another party;

(4) prohibit a person from removing the child beyond a geographical area identified by the court;

(5) require payment of reasonable and necessary attorney's fees and expenses; or

(6) suspend the operation of the order or judgment that is being appealed.

(b) A temporary order under this section enjoining a party from molesting or disturbing the peace of the child or another party:

(1) may be rendered without:

(A) the issuance of a bond between the parties; or

(B) an affidavit or a verified pleading stating specific facts showing that immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result; and

(2) is not required to:

(A) define the injury or state why the injury is irreparable; or

(B) include an order setting the suit for trial on the merits with respect to the ultimate relief sought.

(b-1) A motion seeking an original temporary order under this section:

(1) may be filed before trial; and

(2) may not be filed by a party after the date by which that party is required to file the party's notice of appeal under the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure.

(b-2) The trial court retains jurisdiction to conduct a hearing and sign a temporary order under this section until the 60th day after the date any eligible party has filed a notice of appeal from final judgment under the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure.

(b-3) The trial court retains jurisdiction to modify and enforce a temporary order under this section unless the appellate court, on a proper showing, supersedes the court's order.

(b-4) On the motion of a party or on the court's own motion, after notice and hearing, the trial court may modify a previous temporary order rendered under this section if:

(1) the circumstances of a party have materially and substantially changed since the rendition of the previous order; and

(2) modification is equitable and necessary for the safety and welfare of the child.

(b-5) A party may seek review of the trial court's temporary order under this section by:

(1) petition for writ of mandamus; or

(2) proper assignment in the party's brief.

(c) A temporary order rendered under this section is not subject to interlocutory appeal.

(d) The court may not suspend under Subsection (a)(6) the operation of an order or judgment terminating the parent-child relationship in a suit brought by the state or a political subdivision of the state permitted by law to bring the suit.

(e) The remedies provided in this section are cumulative of all other remedies allowed by law.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 539, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 421 (S.B. 1237), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 732 (H.B. 554), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 109.002. APPELLATE REVIEW. (a) An appeal from a final order rendered in a suit, when allowed under this section or under other provisions of law, shall be as in civil cases generally under the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure, except that an appeal from a final order rendered under Subchapter D, Chapter 152, must comply with Section 152.314.

(a-1) An appeal in a suit in which termination of the parent-child relationship is ordered shall be given precedence over other civil cases by the appellate courts, shall be accelerated, and shall follow the procedures for an accelerated appeal under the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure.

(b) An appeal may be taken by any party to a suit from a final order rendered under this title.

(c) An appeal from a final order, with or without a supersedeas bond, does not suspend the order unless suspension is ordered by the court rendering the order. The appellate court, on a proper showing, may permit the order to be suspended, unless the order provides for the termination of the parent-child relationship in a suit brought by the state or a political subdivision of the state permitted by law to bring the suit.

(d) On the motion of the parties or on the court's own motion, the appellate court in its opinion may identify the parties by fictitious names or by their initials only.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 6.17, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 421, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 539, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 75 (H.B. 906), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 421 (S.B. 1237), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 421 (S.B. 1237), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 109.003. PAYMENT FOR COURT REPORTER'S RECORD. (a) If the party requesting a court reporter's record in an appeal of a suit has filed an affidavit stating the party's inability to pay costs as provided by Rule 20, Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure, and the affidavit is approved by the trial court, the trial court may order the county in which the trial was held to pay the costs of preparing the court reporter's record.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit an official court reporter to be paid more than once for the preparation of the court reporter's record.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 5.0025, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 421 (S.B. 1237), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2017.